Utah statutes.
72-9-303.   Cease and desist orders -- Registration sanctions.

(1)  The department may issue cease and desist orders to any person:

(a) who engages in or represents himself to be engaged in a motor carrier operation that is in violation of this chapter;

(b) to prevent the violation of any of the provisions of this title; and

(c) who otherwise violates this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) (a)  The department shall notify the Motor Vehicle Division of the State Tax Commission upon having reasonable grounds to believe that a motor carrier is in violation of this chapter.  Upon receiving notice by the department, the Motor Vehicle Division shall refuse registration or shall suspend or revoke a registration as provided in Sections 41-1a-109 and 41-1a-110.

(b)  The department shall notify the Motor Vehicle Division immediately upon being satisfied that a motor carrier, reported as being in violation under Subsection (2)(a), is in compliance with this chapter.  Upon receiving notice by the department, the Motor Vehicle Division shall remove any restriction made on a registration under this chapter.

